Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Generally

§ 13-6-101.
Authority to charter.

The state banking board as provided by W.S.

13-1-606

and

13-2-207

through

13-2-214

is authorized to charter state savings and loan associations.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 177, § 2; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “13-1-606 and

13-2-207

” for “13-2-206.”

Laws 2006 ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 13-6-102.
Articles of incorporation; bylaws; definition.

Not less than five (5) natural persons may associate for the purpose of carrying on a savings and loan business by making and acknowledging in triplicate and by filing articles of incorporation specifying:

The name of the proposed association indicating the character of business to be conducted by the association;

The city and county where the principal place of business of the association is to be located, which must be within the state of Wyoming;

The number of its directors, which shall not be less than five (5);

The names, occupation and post office addresses of its first directors;

The names, occupation and post-office addresses of the subscribers to the articles of incorporation, and a statement of the number of shares which each has agreed to take;

The amount of capital actually paid in.

The articles shall be filed in the office of the state banking commissioner for his approval. The association shall at the same time file its bylaws.

The articles of incorporation may be amended by a vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the shareholders voting at any meeting. A copy of the resolution making the amendment shall be certified in triplicate by the president and secretary and filed the same as original articles. The amendment is effective from the time of filing.

Each association shall adopt bylaws which shall be in conformity with the laws of this state. Bylaws shall be open to the inspection of the state banking commissioner and the members of the association at its home office. All bylaws shall be approved by the state banking commissioner before becoming effective.

Bylaws shall specify the terms and plans of becoming and continuing a member and of withdrawal, the plan of making loans, distributing profits, equalizing losses, providing for payment of expenses and for a fund with which to pay losses and other rules as are proper for the conduct of the business of the association not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

As used in this chapter:

“Mutual savings and loan association” means a savings and loan association or savings and loan bank without stock in which the borrowers and depositors are members of the savings and loan association or savings and loan bank and have voting rights as members of the association or bank;

“Shareholder” includes a member of a mutual savings and loan association.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, §§ 2, 3; R.S. 1931, §§ 17-102, 17-103; C.S. 1945, §§ 36-102, 36-104; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-215, 13-217; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (f).

More than one place of business permitted. —

The phrase “principal place of business” in subsection (a)(ii) is a much broader term than § 13-2-202(a)(iv)'s “place where its office shall be located and its operations conducted” and suggests that more than one place of business is permitted. Wyoming Trust & Management v. Bonham, 694 P.2d 106,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 430

(Wyo. 1985).